California, session 20252026, AB2331.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7526 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:7526. If the required consent cannot be obtained, permission by the superior court of the county where the cemetery is situated is sufficient. A court shall grant an application upon a showing of good cause.